Utah statutes.
65A-7-5.   Surface leases -- Procedures for issuing leases.
(1)  The division may issue surface leases of state lands for any period up to
99 years.
(2)  This section does not apply to leases for oil and gas, grazing, or mining
purposes.
(3)  The division shall disclose any known geologic hazard affecting leased
property.
(4) (a) (i)  Surface leases may be entered into by negotiation, public
auction, or other public competitive bidding process as determined by rules of
the division.
(ii)  Requests for proposals (RFP) on state lands may be offered by the
division after public notice.
(b) (i)  A notice of an invitation for bids or a public auction shall, prior
to the auction or acceptance of a bid, be published at least once a week for
three consecutive weeks in one or more newspapers of general circulation in
the county in which the lease is offered.
(ii)  The notice shall be sent, by certified mail, at least 30 days prior to
the auction or acceptance of a bid, to each person who owns property adjoining
the state lands offered for lease.
(c) (i)  Surface leases entered into through negotiation shall be published in
the manner set forth in Subsection (4)(b) 30 days prior to final approval.
(ii)  The notice shall include, at a minimum, a general description of the
lands proposed for lease and the type of lease.
